Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 22 Miscellaneous Rules
31-22-22.
Safety belt use — Child restraint.

Any person transporting a child under the age of eight (8), less than fifty-seven inches (57") in height and less than eighty pounds (80 lbs.), in a motor vehicle operated on the roadways, streets, or highways of this state, shall transport the child in any rear seating position of the motor vehicle properly restrained in a child restraint system approved by the United States Department of Transportation under 49 C.F.R. § 571.213. All infants and toddlers under the age of two (2) years or weighing less than thirty pounds (30 lbs.) shall be restrained in a rear-facing car seat. All children two (2) years of age or older or who have outgrown their rear-facing car seat by height or weight should use a forward-facing car seat with a harness up to the maximum allowed by the child restraint manufacturer. If the child is under eight (8) years old but at least fifty-seven inches (57") in height, or at least eighty pounds (80 lbs.), the child shall be properly wearing a safety belt and/or shoulder harness approved by the Department of Transportation pursuant to 49 C.F.R. § 571.208 in any rear seating position of the motor vehicle. For the purpose of this section, applying to all parts of this section, “rear seating position” means any seating positions located behind the driver and front seat passenger. Under this subsection, a child must be properly restrained in the front seat if:

The vehicle is not equipped with a back seat; or

All rear seating positions are being utilized by other children.

In no event shall failure to wear a child restraint system or safety belt be considered as contributory or comparative negligence, nor the failure to wear the child restraint system, seat belt and/or shoulder harness be admissible as evidence in the trial of any civil action.

Any operator of a motor vehicle transporting a child, who has attained the age of eight (8) years but is under eighteen (18) years of age, in any seating position within a motor vehicle operated on the roadways, streets, or highways of the state shall ensure that the passenger is properly wearing a safety belt and/or shoulder harness system, as defined by 49 C.F.R. § 571.208.

Any operator of a motor vehicle under eighteen (18) years old shall properly wear a safety belt and/or shoulder harness system.

This subsection applies only to those motor vehicles required by federal law to have safety belts.

Any person deemed in violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be issued a citation. If the cited person presents proof of purchase of a federally approved child restraint system under 49 C.F.R. § 571.213 to the issuing police department within seven (7) days of issuance, the department shall void the violation. If the individual fails to present proof of purchase, he or she shall be required to appear for a hearing before the traffic tribunal, and shall be fined as provided in §

31-41.1-4

for each offense, and it shall not be recorded on the person’s driving record within the rules and regulations governing chapter 41.1 of this title.

Any person violating subsection (b) of this section shall be fined as provided in §

31-41.1-4

for each offense. The conviction shall not be recorded on that person’s driving record within the rules and regulations governing chapter 41.1 of this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, any person transporting a child properly restrained in a federally approved child restraint system under 49 C.F.R. § 571.213, but transporting the child in a place other than a rear seating position, in violation of subsection (a) of this section, shall be subject only to the fine contained in subdivision (c)(2) of this section.

All fines collected for violations of this section shall be payable to the state of Rhode Island. Fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds shall be shared with the municipality whose law enforcement department issued the citation for the violations.

Any operator of a motor vehicle transporting a person eighteen (18) years of age and older in any seating position of a motor vehicle operated on the roadways, streets, or highways of this state shall ensure that the person be properly wearing a safety belt and/or shoulder harness system, as defined by 49 C.F.R. § 571.208.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to those motor vehicles required by federal law to have safety belts.

Any person who is an operator of a motor vehicle shall be properly wearing a safety belt and/or shoulder harness system as defined by 49 C.F.R. § 571.208 while the vehicle is in operation on any of the roadways, streets, or highways of this state.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to those motor vehicles required by federal law to have safety belts.

In no event shall failure to be properly restrained by a child restraint system or safety belt be considered as negligence, nor the failure to be properly restrained by the child restraint system or safety belt be admissible as evidence in the trial of any civil action.

The provisions of subsections (b), (f) and (g) of this section shall not apply to a driver or passenger of:

A passenger motor vehicle manufactured before July 1, 1966;

A passenger motor vehicle in which the driver or passenger possesses a written verification from a licensed physician that the driver or passenger is unable to wear a safety seat belt system for physical or medical reasons. The verification time period shall not exceed twelve (12) months at which time a new verification may be issued;

A passenger motor vehicle which is not required to be equipped with a safety seat belt system under federal laws; or

A passenger motor vehicle operated by a letter carrier of the United States Postal Service while performing the duties of a letter carrier.

A program of public information and education designed to educate the motoring public to the benefits of wearing safety belt systems, shall be developed by the department of transportation’s governor’s office on highway safety. The department of transportation’s office on highway safety, in cooperation with the department of health, shall study the effectiveness of the implementation of this section and shall submit to the general assembly a report containing its findings by July 1, 1999.

Any person violating subsection (f) or (g) of this section shall be fined as provided in §

31-41.1-4

. Any conviction for violating subsection (f) or (g) of this section shall not be recorded on that person’s driving record within the rules and regulations governing chapter 41.1 of this title.

No motor vehicle shall be stopped, inspected or detained to determine compliance with subsection (f) or (g) of this section without reasonable suspicion that the operator or passenger(s) of the motor vehicle is in violation of this section.

A law enforcement officer may not search a motor vehicle, its contents, the driver, or a passenger solely because of a violation of subsection (f) or (g) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 303, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 67; P.L. 2001, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 9; P.L. 2009, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 30, § 1.

31-22-22.1.
Child passenger protection — Warnings of hazard and risk.

All law enforcement officers in this state are authorized to provide a verbal warning to any person who shall be deemed to have left a child under the age of seven (7) unattended in a motor vehicle. The warning shall apprise the offending person of the dangers of this practice including, but not limited to, the risk of kidnapping and/or abduction, and the dangers which may result from the accumulation of excessive temperatures within the motor vehicle.

No fine or sanction shall be imposed for a violation of this section, other than a verbal warning, and no record of any kind shall be maintained of the warning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 208, § 1.

31-22-23.
Tow trucks — Identification required.

Every motor vehicle used for the purpose of towing or assisting disabled motor vehicles shall display, in sharp color contrast to the background, and be of such size, shape, and color as to be readily legible during daylight hours, from a distance of fifty feet (50´) while the vehicle is not in motion; the name, address, and telephone number of the registered owner shall be displayed on both sides of the vehicle.

Any person violating this section shall be fined as provided in §

31-41.1-4

.

Any vehicle, except those vehicles exempt from regulation pursuant to the provisions of §

39-12-3

, which are used for the purpose of towing or assisting disabled motor vehicles, which does not have a towing certificate issued by the division of public utilities must have the words “Limited Towing” lettered upon the hood or fenders of the vehicle. The letters must be four inches (4") high in a color which contrasts with the vehicle color and must be on both sides of the hood or both sides of the front fender.

Any person who shall violate this provision shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) upon conviction for a first offense, not more than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) upon conviction for a second offense, and for each subsequent conviction may be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 9.

31-22-24.
Interior lights to be operated before dawn and after dusk during police stop.

The operator of any vehicle upon a highway within this state, upon the stopping of the vehicle by any law enforcement or police officer, shall, at any time from a half-hour after sunset to a half-hour before sunrise, display and operate its interior lights until such time as the officer allows the vehicle to continue in its operation. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 119.

31-22-25.
Approaching horses.

Each operator of a vehicle approaching a horse on a public highway shall reduce speed, proceed with caution and stop if necessary to avoid endangering the equestrian, or frightening or striking the horse. An operator violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a civil violation and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for second or subsequent offenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 296, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 10.

31-22-26.
Noise in vicinity of horse.

No operator of a vehicle in the vicinity of an equestrian and horse may blow a horn, or cause loud or unusual noises, in a manner to startle or frighten the horse. An operator violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a civil violation and upon conviction shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for second or subsequent offenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 296, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 10.

31-22-27.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the applicability of the provision to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or application of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 303, § 2.

31-22-28.
Transporting animals.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transport any animal or animals either for business or pleasure on or in an open air motor vehicle unless the animal or animals being transported:

Is kept in an enclosed area of the motor vehicle;

The animal or animals are under the physical control of a person other than the operator of the motor vehicle; or

The animal or animals are placed in the motor vehicle and safely restrained by a harness manufactured for the purpose of restraining animals by means other than neck restraints.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for a first offense, nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 194, § 1.

31-22-29.
Inspection of fire apparatus vehicles.

Any motor vehicle bearing fire apparatus plates shall be subject to a yearly inspection in accordance with the criteria listed in the national fire protection association (NFPA) standard 1915, 2000 edition.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 327, § 1.

31-22-30.
Text messaging while operating a motor vehicle.

For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Driving” means operating a motor vehicle on a public road, including operation while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic light or stop sign, or otherwise, but does not include operating a motor vehicle when the vehicle has pulled over to the side of, or off, an active roadway and has stopped in a location where it can safely remain stationary.

“Hands free” means the manner in which a wireless handset is operated for the purpose of composing, reading, or sending text messages by using an internal feature or function, or through an attachment or addition, including, but not limited to, an earpiece, headset, remote microphone, or short-range wireless connection, thereby allowing the user to operate said device without the use of hands, except to activate, deactivate, or initiate a feature or function thereof.

“Inoperability” means a motor vehicle that is incapable of being operated or being operated in a safe and prudent manner due to mechanical failure, including, but not limited to, engine overheating or tire failure.

“Motor vehicle” means any vehicle that is self-propelled by a motor, including, but not limited to: automobiles, trucks, vans, construction vehicles, etc.

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, unincorporated association, firm, partnership, joint venture, joint stock association, or other entity or business organization of any kind.

“Personal wireless communication device” means a hand-held device through which personal wireless services (commercial mobile services, unlicensed wireless services, and common carrier wireless exchange access services) are transmitted, but does not include a global navigation satellite receiver used for positioning, emergency notification, or navigation purposes.

“Stopped” means not in motion.

“Text message,” also referred to as short messaging service (SMS), means the process by which users send, read, or receive messages on a wireless handset, including text messages, instant messages, electronic messages, or e-mails, in order to communicate with any person or device.

“Use” means to operate a wireless handset or a personal wireless communication device in a manner not consistent with hands-free operation.

“Wireless handset” means a portable electronic or computing device, including cellular telephones and personal digital assistants (PDAs), capable of transmitting data in the form of a text message.

No person shall use a wireless handset or personal wireless communication device to compose, read, or send text messages while driving a motor vehicle on any public street or public highway within the state of Rhode Island.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b), this section shall not be construed to prohibit the use of any wireless handset or personal wireless communication device by:

Any law enforcement, public safety or police officers, emergency services officials, first aid, emergency medical technicians and personnel, and fire safety officials in the performance of duties arising out of, and in the course of, their employment as such;

A person using a wireless handset to contact an individual listed in subsection (c)(1);

A person using a wireless handset or personal wireless communication device inside a motor vehicle while such motor vehicle is parked, standing, or stopped and is removed from the flow of traffic, in accordance with applicable laws, rules, or ordinances, or is stopped due to the inoperability of such motor vehicle; or

A person activating, viewing, or deactivating a global positioning or navigation device or a global positioning or navigation application.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person driving a motor vehicle from utilizing a hands-free wireless handset.

The nonemergency use by pilot/escort vehicle drivers of portable electronic devices is prohibited.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of one hundred dollars ($100), or a license suspension for up to thirty (30) days, or both; for a second conviction a person shall be subject to a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150), or a license suspension for up to three (3) months, or both; and for a third or subsequent conviction a person shall be subject to a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), or a license suspension for up to six (6) months, or both. All violations arising out of this section shall be heard in the Rhode Island traffic tribunal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 393, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 460, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 462, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 35, § 1.

31-22-31.
Mobile telephone usage by motor vehicle operators.

For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Engage in a call” means talking into or listening on a hand-held personal wireless communication device, but does not include holding a hand-held personal wireless communication device to activate, deactivate, or initiate a function of such telephone.

“Hand-held personal wireless communication device” means a personal wireless communication device with which a user engages in a call using at least one hand.

“Hands-free accessory” means an attachment, add-on, built-in feature, or addition to a personal wireless communication device, whether or not permanently installed in a motor vehicle, that, when used, allows the vehicle operator to maintain both hands on the steering wheel.

“Hands-free personal wireless communication device” means a hand-held personal wireless communication device that has an internal feature or function, or that is equipped with an attachment or addition, whether or not permanently part of such hand-held personal wireless communication device, by which a user engages in a call without the use of either hand, whether or not the use of either hand is necessary to activate, deactivate, or initiate a function of such telephone.

“Immediate proximity” means the distance that permits the operator of a hand-held personal wireless communication device to hear telecommunications transmitted over such hand-held personal wireless communication device, but does not require physical contact with such operator’s ear.

“Mobile telephone” means a personal wireless communication device, analog, wireless, or digital telephone capable of sending or receiving telephone communication without an access line for service.

“Public utility” means a business that provides electricity, natural gas, water, and communications and other information services to residential and commercial customers.

“Using” or “use” means holding a hand-held personal wireless communication device to, or in the immediate proximity of, the user’s ear.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall operate a motor vehicle while using a hand-held personal wireless communication device to engage in a call while such vehicle is in motion.

An operator of a motor vehicle who holds a hand-held personal wireless communication device to, or in the immediate proximity of, the operator’s ear while such vehicle is in motion is presumed to be engaging in a call within the meaning of this section. The presumption established by this subdivision is rebuttable by evidence tending to show that the operator was not engaged in a call.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed as authorizing the seizure or forfeiture of a hand-held personal wireless communication device, unless otherwise provided by law.

Subsection (b)(1) of this section shall not apply to:

The use of a hand-held personal wireless communication device for the sole purpose of communicating with any of the following regarding an emergency situation: an emergency response operator; a hospital, physician’s office or health clinic; an ambulance company; a fire department; a police department; or a public utility; or

Any of the following persons while in the performance of their official duties and within the scope of their employment: a peace officer, as defined in §

12-7-21

, a firefighter or an operator of an ambulance or authorized emergency vehicle, or the operator of a taxi cab, tow truck, or bus without passengers; or employees or agents of a public utility; or

The use of a hands-free personal wireless communication device.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (b)(1) of this section shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100); provided, however, until January 1, 2023, the fine shall be suspended for a first-time violator who provides proof of acquisition of a hands-free accessory subsequent to the violation, but prior to the imposition of a fine.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 180, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 181, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.